District of Columbia statutes.
50-1608

Child safety helmet assistance program.

The District Department of Transportation shall adopt a helmet assistance program which shall include grants and discount programs to assist indigent parents and guardians of children under 16 years of age in obtaining safety helmets.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 9, 32 DCR 764
as added May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-112, § 2(b), 47 DCR 1985
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-184, § 2(d), 55 DCR 6101
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 238(d), 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-184 substituted “District Department of Transportation” for “District of Columbia Department of Public Works”.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction.

Effect of Amendments